Hawaii statutes.
[§342D-5] Rules; specific. The
director may establish by rule, water quality standards, effluent standards,
treatment and pretreatment standards, and standards of performance for specific
areas and types of discharges in the control of water pollution, thereby
allowing for varying local conditions. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next